Maine, session 132, LD1955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3731-B is enacted to read:
§3731-B. Maine Child Care Affordability Program Child Care Award
The Maine Child Care Affordability Program Child Care Award, referred to in this
section as "the award," is established in the department to provide funding to support child
care services for eligible child care providers and early childhood educators who require
child care services for their own children. A child care provider or early childhood educator
who is eligible for the Maine Child Care Affordability Program established in section
3731-A is eligible for the award subject to the following requirements.
1. Licensing requirements; employees. A child care provider or early childhood
educator receiving the award must be employed in a child care facility licensed under
section 8301-A, subsection 2 or by a family child care provider licensed under section
8301-A, subsection 3.
2. Licensing requirements; children. A child of a child care provider or early
childhood educator who is receiving the award must receive child care services in a child
care facility licensed under section 8301-A, subsection 2 or from a family child care
provider licensed under section 8301-A, subsection 3.
3. Quality requirements; employees. A child care provider or early childhood
educator receiving the award must be employed in a child care facility licensed under
section 8301-A, subsection 2 or from a family child care provider licensed under section
8301-A, subsection 3 that meets quality requirements as determined in department rules.
4. Quality requirements; children. A child of a child care provider or early childhood
educator receiving the award must receive child care services in a child care facility
licensed under section 8301-A, subsection 2 or from a family child care provider licensed
under section 8301-A, subsection 3 that meets quality requirements as determined in
department rules.
The department shall provide the award directly to the child care facility or family child
care provider who provides the child care services.
The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules may include
limitations of award amounts, waiting list requirements if sufficient funding is not
available, quality requirements, qualifications of employees receiving the award,
requirements of the child care facility or family child care provider at which the provider
is employed and limitations on the number of children on behalf of whom an award may
be received. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3737-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. RR, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3737-B is enacted to read:
§3737-B. Salary Sustainability Program for Child Care Professionals
1. Program established. The Salary Sustainability Program for Child Care
Professionals, referred to in this section as "the program," is established in the department
to support child care professionals who provide services to children in a child care facility
licensed under section 8301-A, subsection 2 or under a family child care provider licensed
Page 1 - 132LR2206(01)

413 under section 8301-A, subsection 3 by providing salary supplements based on education
424 and experience. Any salary supplement provided by the department under the program to
435 a child care facility or family child care provider must be paid by that child care facility or
446 family child care provider in order to increase wages for any child care provider or early
457 childhood educator who provides services to children.
2. Report. Beginning on January 2, 2026, and annually thereafter, the department
shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over health and human services matters regarding the number of child care professionals
participating in the program, expenditures under the program and progress in implementing
the tiered system required under subsection 4.
3. Five-year assessment. Every 5 years, beginning in 2030, the department shall
include in the annual report required in subsection 2, an assessment of the impact of the
program and any changes necessary to ensure the program's continued effectiveness. The
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human
services matters may report out legislation related to the 5-year assessment in any regular
or special session of the Legislature in the year in which the 5-year assessment is included
in the annual report.
4. Rules; tiered system. The department shall establish by rule and implement a tiered
system for salary supplements under this section. The rules must provide, at a minimum,
3 tiers based on the education and experience levels of child care providers and early
childhood educators. The 2nd tier must provide a salary supplement that is at least 50%
greater than the first tier and the 3rd tier must provide a salary supplement that is at least
50% greater than the 2nd tier. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3737-C is enacted to read:
§3737-C. Program providing child care provider scholarships and apprenticeships
The department shall develop and implement a program that provides scholarship and
apprenticeship opportunities to child care providers and early childhood educators pursuing
degrees or certifications related to their employment. The department may contract with
qualified entities to manage the program.
1. Scholarships. The program provides financial aid scholarships to individuals who
meet the requirements of this subsection. An individual receiving a scholarship must be:
A. Enrolled in or accepted into an accredited early childhood education program or
related field and pursuing an associate, bachelor's or graduate degree;
B. A resident of this State; and
C. Committed to employment in this State as a child care provider or early childhood
educator for a period of time determined by department rule after completion of the
degree or certification awarded while receiving the scholarship.
2. Apprenticeships. The program provides apprenticeships to individuals who meet
the requirements of this subsection. An individual receiving an apprenticeship must be:
A. Employed or seeking employment at a child care facility licensed under section
8301-A, subsection 2 or by a family child care provider licensed under section 8301-A,
subsection 3; and
Page 2 - 132LR2206(01)

B. Committed to employment in this State as a child care provider or early childhood
educator for a period of time determined by department rule after the designated
apprenticeship period has been completed.
3. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Funds for this program may be provided through appropriations from the General
Fund, federal funds, grants or private donations; such funds do not lapse to the General
Fund. All revenues credited to the fund must be distributed to support scholarships and
apprenticeships based on financial need and eligibility as determined by department rules.
Scholarships and apprenticeships awarded may not exceed the amount of funding available.
Sec. 5. State Board of Education to develop opportunities for child care
and early childhood education programs and courses in career and technical
education centers. The State Board of Education shall update its state plan for career
and technical education required pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 8306 to develop opportunities for child care and early childhood education
programs and courses in career and technical education centers. The plan must ensure that
educational opportunities are available in all regions of the State as established in Title
20-A, section 8451. The State Board of Education shall collaborate with the centers and
regions and with the Department of Health and Human Services. No later than January 2,
2026, the State Board of Education shall submit its updated state plan to the Joint Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Standing Committee on Education
and Cultural Affairs. The committees are authorized to report out legislation to the Second
Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 6. Sustainability of Maine Child Care Affordability Program. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a long-term plan that ensures
financial sustainability of the Maine Child Care Affordability Program established in the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3731-A. The plan must include the necessary
level of funding that must be appropriated in order to serve all families that qualify for the
Maine Child Care Affordability Program. The department shall submit a report with the
long-term plan to the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services no later
than January 2, 2026. The committee is authorized to report out legislation to the Second
Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides funding for the monthly wage supplement awarded to child care
workers under the Salary Sustainability Program for Child Care Professionals.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Page 3 - 132LR2206(01)

Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides funding to support the child care needs of families in the Maine Child
Care Affordability Program Child Care Award.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Child Care Affordability Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,800,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,800,000 $0
1140
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $5,300,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $5,300,000 $1,500,000